Virginia statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Chapter 1. Code of Virginia.

§ 1-1.
Contents and designation of Code.

The laws embraced in this and the following titles, chapters, articles and sections of this act shall constitute, and be designated and cited as the “Code of Virginia,” hereinafter referred to as “the Code” or “this Code.”

History.

Code 1919, § 1; R. P. 1948, §

1-1

.

Cross references.

As to rules of construction, see §§

1-200

through

1-257

and notes thereto.

History of Code of 1950 and cumulative supplement.

The proposed Code of Virginia, submitted by the then Commission on Code Recodification to the 1948 session of the General Assembly, with certain amendments fully explained in the preface and known as the “Reorganization Provisions of the Code of Virginia,” was adopted as the Code of Virginia, to be effective as provided in §§

1-2

and

1-2.1

, by an act approved April 6, 1948.

Under authority and direction of chapter 262 of the Acts of 1948, codified as former §§ 9-66 through 9-77 (see now § 30-152 et seq.), the Commission, now styled the Virginia Code Commission, prepared and had published an annotated edition, in ten volumes including the index, of the Code so adopted, with the reorganization provisions and the general acts of the 1948 session incorporated therein.

This edition was submitted to the General Assembly for approval at its 1950 session and was adopted by an act approved January 27, 1950.

The final paragraph of that act, which has not been codified, read in part: “. . . the body of the statute law contained in the foregoing ten volumes is to take effect February one, nineteen hundred fifty as the official Code of Virginia, sometimes for brevity called the Code of 1950.”

The general acts of the 1950 through 2014 sessions have been codified and published, under authority of § 30-152 et seq., in the supplements and in the added and replacement volumes.

§ 1-2.
Effective date of Code.

All the provisions of this Code shall be in force on and after February 1, 1950, except as provided in §

1-2.1

.

History.

Code 1919, § 6567; R. P. 1948, §

1-2

.

Cross references.

As to rules of construction, see §§

1-200

through

1-257

and notes thereto.

§ 1-2.1.
Effective date of certain provisions.

The following provisions of this Code shall become effective July 1, 1948, namely:

Chapter 1 of Title 1; Chapters 1, 8, 9, 12, 14, 15, and 16 of Title 2; Chapter 13 of Title 3; Chapter 11 of Title 6; Chapters 2 and 5 of Title 9; all of Title 10; Article 7 of Chapter 1 of Title 14; Article 3 of Chapter 6 of Title 18; Chapter 2 of Title 19; Chapter 3 of Title 24; Chapter 3 of Title 27; Chapters 15 and 19 of Title 32; all of Title 41; Article 4 of Chapter 6 of Title 42; Articles 2 and 12 of Chapter 1 of Title 44 and all of Chapter 2 of Title 44; Chapter 3 of Title 51; Chapter 1 of Title 52; Chapters 1 through 14, inclusive, of Title 53; Chapter 24 of Title 54; Chapters 12 and 13 of Title 59; Chapter 7 of Title 62; all of Title 63 except Chapter 13.

History.

R. P. 1948, §

1-2.1

.

Cross references.

As to rules of construction, see §§

1-200

through

1-257

and notes thereto.

Editor’s note.

Title 2, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1966, c. 677. Title 3, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1966, c. 702. Title 6, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1966, c. 584. Chapter 2 of Title 9, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1970, c. 463; Acts 1978, c. 580. Chapter 5 of Title 9, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 2001, c. 844. Title 10, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1988, c. 891. Title 14, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1964, c. 386. Title 18, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1960, c. 358. Title 19, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1960, c. 366. Title 24, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1970, c. 462. Chapter 15 of Title 32, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1968, c. 578. Chapter 19 of Title 32, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1979, c. 711. Title 41, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1970, c. 291. Title 42, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1970, c. 606. Chapter 3 of Title 51, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1952, c. 1. Chapter 1 of Title 53, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1956, c. 386; Acts 1970, c. 648; Acts 1972, c. 175; Acts 1974, cc. 44, 45. Chapters 2 through 14 of Title 53, referred to above, were repealed by Acts 1982, c. 636. Chapter 24 of Title 54, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1974, c. 534; Acts 1976, c. 651; Acts 1977, c. 640; Acts 1979, c. 408. Title 59, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1968, c. 439. Title 62, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1968, c. 659. Title 63, referred to above, was repealed by Acts 1968, c. 578.

§ 1-3.
Repeal of acts of a general nature.

All acts and parts of acts of a general nature, in force at the time of the adoption of this Code, shall be repealed from and after February 1, 1950, with such limitations and exceptions as are hereinafter expressed; and all acts and parts of acts of a general nature in force at the time of the adoption of this Code, and in conflict with any of the provisions of this Code which by virtue of §

1-2.1

become effective on July 1, 1948, shall be repealed from and after July 1, 1948, with such limitations and exceptions as are hereinafter expressed.

History.

Code 1919, § 6567; R. P. 1948, §

1-3

.

§ 1-4.
Effect of such repeal generally; effect of revision or amendment of state Constitution.

No such repeal nor any amendment or revision of the Constitution of Virginia shall affect any offense or act committed or done, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing before the day upon which such repeal, amendment or revision takes effect, or any prosecution, suit, or proceeding pending on that day, except that the proceedings thereafter had shall conform, so far as practicable, to the provisions of this Code; and where any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment is mitigated by those provisions, such provisions may, with the consent of the party affected, be applied to any judgment to be pronounced after that day; and such repeal, amendment or revision as to any statute of limitations, under which the bar of a right of action or remedy is complete at the time the repeal, amendment or revision takes effect, shall not be deemed a removal of such bar, but the bar shall continue, notwithstanding such repeal, amendment or revision.

History.

Code 1919, § 6569; R. P. 1948, §

1-4

; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 14.

§ 1-5.
Effect of such repeal as to persons in office.

All persons who, at the time when such repeal takes effect, shall hold any office under any of the acts hereby repealed, shall continue to hold the same according to the tenure thereof, except those offices which may have been abolished, and those as to which a different provision is made by this Code.

History.

Code 1919, § 6571; R. P. 1948, §

1-5

.

§ 1-6.
Effect of repeal of validating statutes.

The repeal by any provisions of this Code of a statute validating previous acts, contracts or transactions shall not affect the validity of such acts, contracts or transactions, but the same shall remain as valid as if there had been no such repeal, but no further.

History.

Code 1919, § 8; R. P. 1948, §

1-6

.

§ 1-7.
Acts passed between certain dates not affected.

The enactment of this Code shall not affect any act passed by the General Assembly, which shall have become a law after January 14, 1948, and before February 1, 1950; but every such act shall have full effect, and so far as the same varies from or conflicts with any provision contained in this Code it shall have effect as a subsequent act, and as repealing any part of this Code inconsistent therewith; provided, however, that any such act which becomes a law between said dates and which amends and reenacts, or reenacts any previously existing provisions of law conferring any power or imposing any duty upon any department, board, commission, agency or officer of the state government whose functions, powers and duties are affected by any of the provisions of this Code becoming effective July 1, 1948, shall be construed as conferring the powers and imposing the duties specified therein upon the department, board, commission, agency or officer of the state government to which or to whom the duties and powers imposed or conferred by such previously existing provisions of law were transferred by the provisions of this Code becoming effective July 1, 1948.

History.

Code 1919, § 6568; R. P. 1948, §

1-7

.

§ 1-8.
Notice, recognizance or process given, taken or issued before Code in force.

Although a notice, recognizance or process shall have been given, taken or issued before the day prescribed for the commencement of this Code, or of any provisions of this Code, it may, nevertheless, be given, taken or returnable to a day after such commencement, or to a court established by this Code or the clerk’s office of such court, in like manner as if this Code had commenced before the same was given, taken, or issued.

History.

Code 1919, § 6570; R. P. 1948, §

1-8

.

§ 1-9.
Pending cases; parties; where books, records and papers to remain.

Nothing in this Code shall operate to discontinue any cause or matter, civil or criminal, which shall be pending and undetermined in any court on the day before this Code, or any provision of this Code, takes effect; but every such cause and matter shall be proceeded in, tried and determined in such court, or in the court which succeeds to or has its jurisdiction, and in the names of the same parties, or in the names of any officers, boards, commission, or other persons or bodies who may have succeeded under the provisions of this Code to the rights or obligations of such parties, or any of them. The papers and records of such causes and matters, and all books, records and papers whatever which on such day may be in the custody of any clerk of a court shall remain in custody of the clerk of the same, or of such court as succeeds to or has its jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1919, § 6570; R. P. 1948, §

1-9

.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Operability of statute. —

Section

1-219.1

did not prohibit the housing authority from acquiring the owners’ property because §

1-239

and case precedent made clear that Acts 2007, c. 926, cl. 3, allowed proceedings instituted by redevelopment and housing authorities before July 1, 2010, to continue until resolution. Norfolk Redevelopment & Hous. Auth. v. Cent. Radio, Inc., 82 Va. Cir. 240, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 85 (Norfolk Feb. 17, 2011).

Condemnation proceeding. —

Section

1-219.1

did not apply to a condemnation proceeding because, although the proceeding was not finalized before the July 1, 2010, effective date of the statute, the proceeding was instituted under the former law and before the new law took effect; to hold otherwise would have improperly discontinued a pending matter in violation of §

1-9

. Norfolk Redevelopment & Hous. Auth. v. Pryer, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 84 (Norfolk May 16, 2011).